Utah statutes.
62A-7-702.   Case management staff.
(1)  The division shall provide a sufficient number of case management staff
members to provide care, treatment, and supervision for youth offenders on
parole and for youth offenders committed to the division by the juvenile
courts for community-based programs.
(2) (a)  Case management staff shall develop treatment programs for each youth
offender in the community, provide appropriate services, and monitor
individual progress.
(b)  Progress reports shall be filed every three months with the juvenile
court for each youth offender committed to the division for community-based
programs and with the authority for each parolee.
(c)  The authority, in the case of parolees, or the juvenile court, in the
case of youth committed to the division for placement in community programs,
shall be immediately notified, in writing, of any violation of law or of
conditions of parole or placement.
(3)  Case management staff shall:
(a)  conduct investigations and make reports requested by the courts to aid
them in determining appropriate case dispositions; and
(b)  conduct investigations and make reports requested by the authority to aid
it in making appropriate dispositions in cases of parole, revocation, and
termination.
